Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. In General

§ 11-25-101.
Wyoming gaming commission created; composition; qualifications.

The Wyoming gaming commission is created to be composed of nine (9) persons who have resided in the state for four (4) years and are qualified electors of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.1; Laws 1969, ch. 64, § 5; 1971, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

substituted “Wyoming gaming commission” for “Wyoming pari-mutuel commission” and “nine (9)” for “seven (7).”

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

Cited

in

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of owner or operator of horse or dog racing track for injury from racing operations or conditions of premises, 87 ALR2d 1179.

§ 11-25-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Breeder award” means monies collected pursuant to W.S. 11-25-201(j) and distributed by the commission to promote the improved breeding and development of the horse industry in Wyoming. Breeder awards may include purse enhancement of Wyoming bred races;

“Commission” means the Wyoming gaming commission;

“Drug” means any substance foreign to a horse’s body as prescribed by the commission;

“Event” means a pari-mutuel event;

“Pari-mutuel event” means the events which are authorized by the commission for the conduct of horse racing (to include quarter horse, thoroughbred or other approved races), harness racing, cutter racing, chariot racing, chuckwagon racing, professional roping and rodeo events and simulcasting of dog racing and the events described in this paragraph as prescribed by the commission. Notwithstanding W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iv) and

11-25-203

, the commission may authorize and promulgate rules providing for pari-mutuel wagering on events that have previously occurred, utilizing an electronic system or device that affords an opportunity for the exercise of skill or judgment where the outcome is not completely controlled by chance alone;

“Pari-mutuel wagering” means wagering on the outcome of pari-mutuel events in which those who wager purchase tickets of various denominations on entrants in the events and all wagers for each event are pooled and held by the permittee for distribution, and when the outcome of the event has been decided, the permittee distributes the total wagers comprising the pool, less an amount not greater than twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.90%) for live racing and in the event of simulcasting an amount not to exceed the percentage allowed at the host track or thirty-five percent (35%), whichever is less and less the amount for breakage to holders of tickets on the winning entries;

“Simulcasting” means the sale of pari-mutuel pools electronically transmitted live or historic on interstate or intrastate pari-mutuel events as prescribed by the commission. The commission shall authorize simulcasting subject to the following conditions:

Simulcasting may be conducted only by a holder of a permit to simulcast issued under this act. The permit shall be authorized by the commission for a period not to exceed three (3) years from the date of issuance. The commissioners shall issue a simulcast permit only to an applicant authorized under this act to conduct a pari-mutuel event other than simulcasting;

Simulcasting may be conducted off the permitted premises only if the board of county commissioners of the county in which such simulcasting will be conducted grant [grants] its approval;

No simulcasting may be conducted within one hundred (100) miles of any premises permitted under this act, except that the commission may waive the one hundred (100) mile limitation if the simulcast permit application includes written approval from the permittee whose permitted premises is within the one hundred (100) mile limitation;

The commission shall promulgate rules for conducting simulcasting as are reasonably necessary to protect the public interest.

“This act” means W.S.

11-25-101

through

11-25-306

;

“Multiple wagering” means wagers which consist of a single betting interest on two (2) entries;

“Exotic wagering” means wagers which consist of a single betting interest on three (3) or more entries;

“Advance deposit pari-mutuel wager” means a wager in which a person who has opened an account in advance with a licensee can place wagers from this account in person, by telephone or other electronic means;

“Horsemen’s association” means the association that represents the majority of the owners and trainers licensed by the commission to race horses at an event;

“Out-of-state simulcast facility” means a track or other facility, located within a jurisdiction other than Wyoming, at which pari-mutuel wagers are placed, accepted or distributed, either in person or electronically, on simulcast races pursuant to proper authorization under the laws of that jurisdiction;

“Source market fee” means a license fee, assessed by the commission pursuant to W.S. 11-25-201(m), payable by out-of-state simulcast facilities that conduct pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast races and that accept wagers from Wyoming residents by telephone or other electronic means at those facilities;

“Net proceeds” means all revenue less the payment to the player;

“Establishment” means a single physical place of business;

“Operator” means a person who possesses and operates an establishment where skill based amusement games may be played for profit;

“Skill” means a player’s knowledge, dexterity or any other ability or expertise relevant to game play;

“Skill based amusement game” means a game played in exchange for consideration of cash, credit or other thing of value on a fixed, commercial electrical gaming device in which the bona fide skill of the player, determined by an individual’s level of strategy and skill, rather than any inherent element of chance, is the primary factor in determining the outcome and for which the player may be awarded a prize or other thing of value for a successful outcome. “Skill based amusement game” shall not include any game played for prizes of nominal value as provided by rule of the commission;

“Vendor” means a person who owns and distributes a skill based amusement game to an operator for profit.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.1; Laws 1969, ch. 64, § 5; 1971, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; 1991, ch. 145, § 1; ch. 148, § 1; 2001, ch. 117, § 1; 2003, ch. 199, § 1; 2006, ch. 26, § 1; 2010, ch. 17, § 1; 2011, ch. 6, § 1; 2012, ch. 4, § 1; 2013 ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; 2020 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “for live racing and in the event of simulcasting an amount not to exceed the percentage allowed at the host track or thirty-five percent (35%), whichever is less” in (a)(vi).

The 2010 amendment,

effective January 1, 2011, added (a)(xii).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(xiii) and (a)(xiv).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(vii)(A), deleted “annually” following “authorized,” and substituted “period not to exceed three (3) years from the date of issuance” for “specified number of days.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence in (a)(v); and added “electronically transmitted live or historic,” and deleted “televised” in (a)(vii).

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 114, § 2, in (a)(ii) substituted “Wyoming gaming commission” for “Wyoming pari-mutuel commission”; and added (a)(xv).

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, substituted “professional roping and rodeo events” for “professional roping events.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

substituted "11-25-201(j)" for "11-25-105(j)" in (a)(i); substituted "11-25-203" for "11-25-107" in (a)(v); substituted "11-25-306" for "11-25-113" in (a)(viii); substituted "11-25-201(m)" for "11-25-105(m)" in (a)(xiv); and added (a)(xvi) through (a)(xx).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

Simulcasting. —

Definition of “simulcasting” set out in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 11-25-102(a)(vii)(C) suggests that pari-mutuel races are generally live events. Wyoming Downs Rodeo Events v. Company V., 2006 WY 55, 134 P.3d 1223,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Contracts for breeding horses, 34 ALR5th 651.

§ 11-25-103.
Gaming commission; appointment, terms of office and political affiliation of members; vacancies; appointment districts.

The governor with the consent of the senate shall appoint the nine (9) members of the commission in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

. Seven (7) of the nine (9) members shall be appointed from each appointment district under W.S.

9-1-218

. One (1) of the remaining members shall be, at the time of appointment and during the term of appointment, an active county or municipal law enforcement officer certified under title 9, chapter 1, article 7 of the Wyoming statutes. One (1) of the remaining members shall be an enrolled member of the Northern Arapaho or Eastern Shoshone Indian tribe with not less than five (5) years of regulatory gaming experience. Members shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years and until their successor is appointed and qualified. Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the governor as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

. A member of the commission may succeed himself for one (1) full four (4) year term. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Additionally, one (1) senator appointed by the president of the senate, one (1) representative appointed by the speaker of the house and one (1) gubernatorial representative shall serve as liaisons to the commission. Legislative liaisons shall be paid salary, per diem and mileage as provided in W.S.

28-5-101

when attending meetings of the commission.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.2; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 175, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted the former second sentence, which read, “No more than four (4) members shall be registered in the same political party.”

The 2020 amendment,

substituted “nine (9)” for “seven (7)” and “Seven (7) of the nine (9) members” for “One (1) member” and added the third and fourth sentences and the last two sentences.

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

§ 11-25-104.
Gaming commission; officers; director; meetings; quorum; records; licenses generally; effect of financial interest in events.

The commission shall annually elect from its membership a president and vice-president, and may employ a director who has a working knowledge of pari-mutuel betting, horse racing and other forms of gaming regulated by the commission or an executive secretary, or both. The director may be retained on a yearly basis or for the racing season only as determined by the commission. Salary for the director or executive secretary shall be determined by the commission with the consent of the personnel division. The commission may also employ other personnel required to carry out this act.

The commission shall hold an annual fall meeting in Wyoming and shall hold special meetings at such times and places within Wyoming as the majority of the members determine. A majority of the commission constitutes a quorum and a majority vote of a quorum may act for the commission. The secretary of the commission shall keep a record of the proceedings of the commission which is open at all times for public inspection. Legislative liaisons shall be considered members of the governing body of the commission for purposes of attending executive sessions held pursuant to W.S. 16-4-405(a) only.

Any member of the commission who has a personal or private interest in any matter proposed or pending before the commission shall publicly disclose this fact to the commission and shall not vote on the matter.

Any member of the commission who owns or has any interest, or whose spouse or member of his immediate family has any interest, in any activity regulated by the commission or in an animal participating in a pari-mutuel event shall disclose that interest and shall not participate in any commission decision involving a protest regarding that activity or occurring at that pari-mutuel event.

The commission may authorize by license or permit and supervise all the conduct of all events provided for and regulated by this act. The commission may make reasonable rules for the control, supervision and direction of applicants, permittees and licensees. The rules shall include procedures for resolving scheduling conflicts and settling disputes between permittees, for the supervising, disciplining, suspending, fining and barring from pari-mutuel events of all persons required to be licensed or permitted by this act, and for the holding, conducting and operating of all pari-mutuel events pursuant to this act. The commission may require that license applicants be fingerprinted for identification purposes as a condition of licensing. The commission shall announce the place, time and duration of pari-mutuel events for which license or permit fees shall be required and establish reasonable fees for all licenses and permits provided for by this act. The fees shall be established to ensure that the costs of administering this act are recovered through the total revenues received under this act. The commission shall establish security access safeguards for licensees to use for advance deposit pari-mutuel wagering. The commission shall prohibit advance deposit pari-mutuel advertising that it determines to be deceptive to the public.

Each permittee, participant and employee of a permittee or participant who is directly involved in the horse racing or pari-mutuel wagering activities of the permittee or participant, as defined in commission rule and regulation, shall be licensed by the commission and shall comply with all rules and regulations and all orders issued by the commission. No person shall hold any event with pari-mutuel wagering without obtaining a permit.

The commission may delegate authority to enforce rules of the commission and this act to three (3) stewards at each pari-mutuel event, at least one (1) of whom shall be an employee of and selected by the commission. The commission shall require at least one (1) steward to supervise each simulcast location that is approved by the commission. Stewards shall exercise such reasonable and necessary authority as is designated by rules of the commission including the following:

Enforce rules of the commission and this act;

Rule on the outcome of events;

Levy fines not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for violations of rules of the commission. Violations shall be reported daily and fines paid to the commission within forty-eight (48) hours of imposition and notice;

Suspend licenses not to exceed thirty (30) calendar days for violations of rules of the commission. Suspensions shall be reported to the commission daily;

Recommend the commission impose fines or suspensions greater than permitted by paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection.

Only a licensed steward of the permitted event may impose fines or license suspensions except that a starter may impose fines when horses arrive at the gate until off time in an amount not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200.00).

Any fine or license suspension imposed by a steward or fine imposed by a starter may be appealed in writing to the commission within five (5) days after its imposition. The commission may affirm or reverse the decision of a steward or starter or may increase or decrease any fine or suspension. A fine imposed by the commission shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00). Suspensions of a license may be for any period of time, but shall be commensurate with the seriousness of the offense.

The commission shall access criminal history record information for all operators and vendors under chapter 3 of this article and all licensees, permittees and employees of the commission under W.S. 9-1-627(d) for the purposes of this act. Every applicant for a permit or license under this act shall provide the commission fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided under W.S.

7-19-201

.

The commission shall establish the number of actual live horse racing or pari-mutuel event days required to qualify for a simulcasting permit. The commission shall adopt rules governing establishment of live horse racing or pari-mutuel event days required for a simulcasting permit in a manner that ensures fair and equitable involvement of all affected parties, including consideration of the economic viability of those days to permit applicants.

Commencing July 1, 2020, any person conducting an activity as specified by W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iii)(D) or (F) shall first obtain a license from the commission. Under this subsection, the commission shall not charge license applicants any fee and shall not require any fee for any license issued. Any person required to be licensed under this subsection shall file an annual report with the commission as specified by rule.

In addition to all other duties, the commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall:

Enforce W.S.

6-7-101

through

6-7-104

;

Regulate online sports wagering and sports wagering operators and vendors under W.S.

9-24-101

through

9-24-106

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.3; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 2003, ch. 199, § 1; 2006, ch. 26, § 1; 2010, ch. 17, § 1; 2011, ch. 33, § 1; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; 2021 ch. 100, § 2, effective September 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, deleted the last sentence in (j), which read: “The commission is authorized to access criminal history record information for all licensees, permittees and employees of the commission under W.S. 9-1-627(d) for the purposes of this act” and added (k).

The 2010 amendment,

effective January 1, 2011, added (m).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (f), inserted “of a permittee or participant who is directly involved in the horse racing or pari-mutuel wagering activities of the permittee or participant, as defined in commission rule and regulation”; and in (g)(iii), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “two hundred dollars ($200.00).”

The 2020 amendment,

in (a) added “and other forms of gaming regulated by the commission” following “horse racing” and made a related change; in (e) substituted “may authorize by license or permit” for “shall authorize by permits,” “this act. The commission may make” for “this act, and shall make,” “rules” for “rules and regulations,” “applicants, permittees and licensees. The rules shall include procedures for resolving” for “applicants permittees, including regulations providing for resolving,” “between permittees, for the supervising” for “between permittees and the supervising,” “to be licensed or permitted” for “to be licensed,” and “pari-mutuel events pursuant” for “pari-mutuel events conducted pursuant”; and added (n) and (o).

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 100, § 2, effective September 1, 2021, in (d), added "any activity regulated by the commission or in" and "regarding that activity or"; added the (o)(i) designation; added (o)(ii); and made related changes.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 109, § 2, added the last sentence in (b); in the first sentence of (k), substituted "shall" for "is authorized to" and added "operators and vendors under chapter 3 of this article and all."

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-25-102(a)(viii).

Cited

in

Quoted

in

§ 11-25-105.
Pari-mutuel permits; fees and reports; disposition of funds; enforcement of provisions. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.4; Laws 1969, ch. 64, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3; 1973, ch. 27, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 55, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; 1991, ch. 145, § 1; ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 74, § 1; 2003, ch. 199, § 1; 2005, ch. 157, § 2; ch. 231, § 1; 2011, ch. 6, § 1; 2012, ch. 4, § 1; 2013 ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 163, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 203, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-201

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-106.
Qualifications as to horses; preference to Wyoming bred horses. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.5; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-202

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-107.
Horses to race under true name; substitution of horses, concealment of identification, prohibited. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.6; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-203

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-108.
Stimulation or retardation of animals prohibited; tests. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.7; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-204

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-109.
Bribery, touting and betting by minors prohibited. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, §§ 8, 9, 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-497.8, 11-497.9, 11-497.11; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§

11-29-108

,

11-29-109

,

11-29-111

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-205

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-110.
County elections as to pari-mutuel events. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.12; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-112

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-206

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-111.
Bond of permittees; required; conditions; prosecution of actions. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, §§ 13, 14; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-497.13, 11-497.14; W.S. 1977, §§

11-29-113

,

11-29-114

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981 Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-207

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-112.
Penalties. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.15; Laws 1969, ch. 64, § 4; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-115

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-208

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-113.
Removal of livestock from quarters at county or state fairs. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.16; W.S. 1977, § 11-29-116; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-209

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.